tr: El perküsyon perdesi tipi: Perdeli (belirli); Akort edilebilir; Perdesiz (belirsiz); Diğer
en: Hand percussion pitch type: Pitched (definite); Tunable; Unpitched (indefinite); Other
ko: 손 타악기 피치 유형: 유율(명확한 피치); 튜닝 가능; 무율(불명확한 피치); 기타
pl: Typ wysokości dźwięku ręcznego instrumentu perkusyjnego: Z określoną wysokością dźwięku; Strojone; Bez określonej wysokości dźwięku; Inne
zh-TW: 手持打擊樂器音高類型: 有音高 (固定音高); 可調音; 無音高 (非固定音高); 其他
pt-BR: Percussão de mão afinação tipo: Altura definida; Afinável; Altura indefinida; Outro
hu: Kézi ütőhangszer hangmagasságának típusa: Hangolt (meghatározott); Hangolható; Nem hangolt (meghatározatlan); Egyéb
es: Tipo de tono de percusión manual: Afinado (definido); Afinable; No afinado (indefinido); Otro
it: Tipo di intonazione delle percussioni a mano: Ad altezza determinata; Accordabile; Ad altezza indeterminata; Altro
fi: Kädessä pidettävien lyömäsoittimien sävelkorkeuden tyyppi: Viritetty (tietty sävelkorkeus); Viritettävä; Virittämätön (määrittämätön sävelkorkeus); Muu
ja: ハンドパーカッションのピッチタイプ: 音階あり (定音); チューニング可能; 音階なし (不定音); その他
fr: Type de hauteur sonore de la percussion à main: À hauteur déterminée; Accordable; À hauteur indéterminée; Autre
cs: Typ výšky tónu ručního úderu: S určitou výškou tónu; Laditelné; S neurčitou výškou tónu; Jiný
sl-SI: Vrsta višine tona ročnih tolkal: Določena višina tona; Uglasljivo; Nedoločljiva višina tona (nedoločeno); Drugo
nb: Håndperkusjonstype: Stemmet (bestemt tonehøyde); Stembar; Ustemmet (ubestemt tonehøyde); Annet
nl: Handpercussie toonhoogte type: Gestemd (bepaald); Stembaar; Ongestemd (onbepaald); Overig
el: Τύπος τονικού ύψους για κρουστά χειρός: Κουρδισμένο (συγκεκριμένου τονικού ύψους); Κουρδιζόμενο; Ακούρδιστο (ακαθόριστου τονικού ύψους); Άλλο
hr-HR: Vrsta tona zvuka za udaranje rukom: S određenom visinom tona; Ugodivo; S neodređenom visinom tona; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип височина на тона на ръчния перкусионен инструмент: С определена височина на тона; Настройваем; С неопределена височина на тона; Друго
da: Type tonehøjde for håndpercussion: Bestemt tonehøjde; Kan stemmes; Ubestemt tonehøjde; Andet
de: Tonhöhentyp der Handperkussion: Gestimmt (bestimmte Tonhöhe); Stimmbar; Ungestimmt (unbestimmte Tonhöhe); Sonstige
pt-PT: tipo de tom de percussão manual: Com tom (definido); Afinável; Sem tom (indefinido); Outro
th: ประเภทระดับเสียงของเครื่องดนตรีประเภทเคาะด้วยมือ: มีระดับเสียง (ชัดเจน); ตั้งเสียงได้; ไม่มีระดับเสียง (ไม่ชัดเจน); อื่นๆ
ru: Тип высоты звучания ручной перкуссии: С определенной высотой звука; Настраиваемый; С неопределенной высотой звука; Другое
ro-RO: Tip de tonalitate a percuției manuale: Sunet determinat (acordat); Acordabil; Sunet nedeterminat; Altele
vi: Loại cao độ của nhạc cụ gõ cầm tay: Có cao độ (xác định); Có thể chỉnh âm; Không cao độ (không xác định); Khác
sv: Typ av tonhöjd för handhållet slagverk: Stämd (bestämd tonhöjd); Stämbar; Ostämd (obestämd tonhöjd); Övrigt
lt-LT: Rankinių mušamųjų garso aukščio tipas: Skambantis nustatytu aukščiu (apibrėžtas); Derinamas; Skambantis nenustatytu aukščiu (neapibrėžtas); Kita
zh-CN: 手持打击乐器音高类型: 有音高（固定）; 可调音; 无音高（不固定）; 其他
sk-SK: Typ výšky tónu pre ručné perkusie: Ladené (určitá výška tónu); Laditeľné; Neladené (neurčitá výška tónu); Iné